Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
804

BAIL; BOND
TO KEEP THE PEACE

Part I. Bail; Recognizance

Section

804-1 Bail defined

804-2 Unclaimed bail money

804-3 Bailable offenses

804-4 When a matter of right

804-5 By whom allowed

804-6 Bail bond after conviction

804-7 Release after bail

804-7.1 Conditions of release on bail,
recognizance, or

supervised release

804-7.2 Violations of conditions of release on
bail,

recognizance, or supervised release

804-7.3 Sanctions for violation of conditions of
release on

bail, recognizance, or supervised release

804-7.4 General conditions of release on bail

804-8 No bail where wounding may terminate in
death

804-9 Amount

804-10 Repealed

804-10.5 Sureties; qualification

804-11 One surety sufficient; when

804-11.5 Cash, credit and debit card authorization,
stocks,

bonds, or real property as security for
bail

804-12 Bond for minor

804-13 Insufficient bail

804-14 Discharge of sureties

804-15 Recognizance

804-16 Bail bond, etc., deposited where

804-17 Prompt appearance and response; default

804-18 Witness, summary process for

804-19 Times for appearance

Part II. Bond to Keep the Peace

804-31 Offense against complainant, arrest

804-32 Bond pending trial and upon appeal

804-33 Trial; bond protecting complainant

804-34 Bond not executed

804-35 Bond protecting others

804-36 Term and renewal of bond

804-37 Offense in presence of district judge

804-38 Offense against other than complainant;
arrest

804-39 Bond in addition to conviction

804-40 Suit on bond

804-41 Discharge of surety

Part III. Forfeiture

804-51 Procedure

Part IV. Miscellaneous Provisions

804-61 Repealed

804-62 Limit of compensation; penalty

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

Cross References

Arrest warrants arising from outstanding traffic warrants,
see §§353-66.5 and 604-7.2.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next